Nebraska, session 109, LB97.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 29-2292, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
29-2292 (1) Upon a finding of guilt for which a judgment of conviction may
be rendered, a defendant may request the court defer the entry of judgment of
conviction. Upon such request and after giving the prosecutor and defendant the
opportunity to be heard, the court may defer the entry of a judgment of
conviction and the imposition of a sentence and place the defendant on
probation, upon conditions as the court may require under section 29-2262.
(2) The court shall not defer judgment under this section if:
(a) The offense is a violation of section 42-924;
(b) The victim of the offense is an intimate partner as defined in section
28-323;
(c) The offense is a violation of section 60-6,196 or 60-6,197 or a city
or village ordinance enacted in conformance with section 60-6,196 or 60-6,197;
or
(d) The defendant is not eligible for probation; or .
(e) For any driver holding a commercial driver's license or CLP-commercial
learner's permit issued pursuant to the Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act,
such deferred judgment would mask the conviction and lead to noncompliance with
federal law or regulation and subject this state to possible loss of federal
money.
(3) Whenever a court considers a request to defer judgment, the court
shall consider the factors set forth in section 29-2260 and any other
information the court deems relevant.
(4) Except as otherwise provided in this section and sections 29-2293 and
29-2294, the supervision of a defendant on probation pursuant to a deferred
judgment shall be governed by the Nebraska Probation Administration Act and
sections 29-2270 to 29-2273.
(5) After a hearing providing the prosecutor and defendant an opportunity
to be heard and upon a finding that a defendant has violated a condition of his
or her probation, the court may enter any order authorized by section 29-2268
or pronounce judgment and impose such new sentence as might have been
originally imposed for the offense for which the defendant was convicted.
(6) Upon satisfactory completion of the conditions of probation and the
payment or waiver of all administrative and programming fees assessed under
section 29-2293, the defendant or prosecutor may file a motion to withdraw any
plea entered by the defendant and to dismiss the action without entry of
judgment.
(7) The provisions of this section apply to offenses committed on or after
July 1, 2020. For purposes of this section, an offense shall be deemed to have
been committed prior to July 1, 2020, if any element of the offense occurred
-1-

LB97 LB97
2025 2025
prior to such date.
Sec. 2. Section 37-1201, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
37-1201 Sections 37-1201 to 37-12,110 and sections 4 and 5 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the State Boat Act. It is the policy of this
state to promote safety for persons and property in and connected with the use,
operation, and equipment of vessels and to promote uniformity of laws relating
thereto.
Sec. 3. Section 37-1202, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
37-1202 For the purposes of the State Boat Act, unless the context
otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 37-1203 to 37-1210 and
section 4 of this act shall be used.
Sec. 4. Amphibious vehicle means a vehicle that is a means of transport
viable on land and on or under water.
Sec. 5. Sections 37-1211 to 37-1231 and 37-1275 to 37-12,108 shall not
apply to an amphibious vehicle if a current and valid registration has been
issued for such amphibious vehicle under the Motor Vehicle Registration Act.
Sec. 6. Section 37-1284, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
37-1284 In the event of a lost or destroyed certificate of title, the
owner of the motorboat or the holder of a lien on the motorboat shall apply,
upon a form prescribed by the Department of Motor Vehicles, to any county
treasurer or to the department for a certified copy of the certificate of title
and shall pay the fee prescribed by section 37-1287. The application shall be
signed and sworn to by the person making the application. The county treasurer,
with the approval of the department, or the department shall issue a certified
copy of the certificate of title to the person entitled to receive the
certificate of title. If the county treasurer's records of the title have been
destroyed pursuant to section 37-1279, the county treasurer shall issue a
duplicate certificate of title to the person entitled to receive the
certificate upon such showing as the county treasurer deems sufficient. If the
applicant cannot produce such proof of ownership, he or she may apply directly
to the department and submit such evidence as he or she may have, and the
department may, if it finds the evidence sufficient, authorize the county
treasurer to issue a duplicate certificate of title. The new purchaser shall be
entitled to receive an original title upon presentation of the assigned
duplicate copy of the certificate of title, properly assigned to the new
purchaser, to the county treasurer as prescribed in section 37-1278. Any
purchaser of the motorboat may at the time of purchase require the seller of
the motorboat to indemnify him or her and all subsequent purchasers of the
motorboat against any loss which he, she, or they may suffer by reason of any
claim presented upon the original certificate. In the event of the recovery of
the original certificate of title by the owner, he or she shall immediately
surrender the certificate to the county treasurer or the department for
cancellation.
Sec. 7. Section 60-101, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
60-101 Sections 60-101 to 60-197 and section 9 of this act shall be known
and may be cited as the Motor Vehicle Certificate of Title Act.
Sec. 8. Section 60-102, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
60-102 For purposes of the Motor Vehicle Certificate of Title Act, unless
the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 60-103 to
60-136.01 and section 9 of this act shall be used.
Sec. 9. Junk vehicle means a vehicle that:
(1) Is incapable of operating on any highway as defined in section 39-101;
and
(2) Has no value except as scrap or a source of parts.
Sec. 10. Section 60-121, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
60-121 (1) Minibike means a two-wheel device that:
(a) Has which has a total wheel and tire diameter of less than fourteen
inches; or
(b) Has an engine-rated capacity of less than forty-five cubic centimeters
displacement; or
(c) Has an engine power output of less than three horsepower;
(d) Has an engine-rated capacity of less than two thousand two hundred
thirty-eight watts; or
(e) Was any other two-wheel device primarily designed by the manufacturer
for off-road use only.
(2) Minibike does not include an electric personal assistive mobility
device.
Sec. 11. Section 60-137, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
60-137 (1) The Motor Vehicle Certificate of Title Act applies to all
vehicles as defined in the act, except:
(a) Farm trailers;
(b) Fertilizer trailers;
(c) (b) Well-boring apparatus, backhoes, bulldozers, and front-end
loaders; and
(d) (c) Trucks and buses from other jurisdictions required to pay
registration fees under the Motor Vehicle Registration Act, except a vehicle
-2-

LB97 LB97
2025 2025
registered or eligible to be registered as part of a fleet of apportionable
vehicles under section 60-3,198.
(2)(a) All new all-terrain vehicles and minibikes sold on or after January
1, 2004, shall be required to have a certificate of title. An owner of an all-
terrain vehicle or minibike sold prior to such date may apply for a certificate
of title for such all-terrain vehicle or minibike as provided in rules and
regulations of the department.
(b) All new low-speed vehicles sold on or after January 1, 2012, shall be
required to have a certificate of title. An owner of a low-speed vehicle sold
prior to such date may apply for a certificate of title for such low-speed
vehicle as provided in rules and regulations of the department.
(3) An owner of a utility trailer may apply for a certificate of title
upon compliance with the Motor Vehicle Certificate of Title Act.
(4)(a) Every owner of a manufactured home or mobile home shall obtain a
certificate of title for the manufactured home or mobile home prior to affixing
it to real estate.
(b) If a manufactured home or mobile home has been affixed to real estate
and a certificate of title was not issued before it was so affixed, the owner
of such manufactured home or mobile home shall apply for and be issued a
certificate of title at any time for surrender and cancellation as provided in
section 60-169.
(5) All new utility-type vehicles sold on or after January 1, 2011, shall
be required to have a certificate of title. An owner of a utility-type vehicle
sold prior to such date may apply for a certificate of title for such utility-
type vehicle as provided in rules and regulations of the department.
Sec. 12. Section 60-146, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
60-146 (1) An application for a certificate of title for a vehicle shall
include a statement that an identification inspection has been conducted on the
vehicle unless (a) the title sought is a salvage branded certificate of title
or a nontransferable certificate of title, (b) the surrendered ownership
document is a Nebraska certificate of title, a manufacturer's statement of
origin, an importer's statement of origin, a United States Government
Certificate to Obtain Title to a Vehicle, or a nontransferable certificate of
title, (c) the application contains a statement that the vehicle is to be
registered under section 60-3,198, (d) the vehicle is a cabin trailer, (e) the
title sought is the first title for the vehicle sold directly by the
manufacturer of the vehicle to a dealer franchised by the manufacturer, or (f)
the vehicle was sold at an auction authorized by the manufacturer and purchased
by a dealer franchised by the manufacturer of the vehicle.
(2) The department shall prescribe a form to be executed by a dealer and
submitted with an application for a certificate of title for vehicles exempt
from inspection pursuant to subdivision (1)(e) or (f) of this section. The form
shall clearly identify the vehicle and state under penalty of law that the
vehicle is exempt from inspection.
(3) The statement that an identification inspection has been conducted
shall be furnished by the county sheriff of any county or by any other holder
of a certificate of training issued pursuant to section 60-183, shall be in a
format as determined by the department, and shall expire ninety days after the
date of the inspection. The county treasurer shall accept a certificate of
inspection, approved by the superintendent, from an officer of a state police
agency of another state unless an inspection is required under section 60-174.
(4)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) of this subsection, the
identification inspection shall include examination and notation of the then
current odometer reading, if any, and a comparison of the vehicle
identification number with the number listed on the ownership records, except
that if a lien is registered against a vehicle and recorded on the vehicle's
ownership records, the county treasurer shall provide a copy of the ownership
records for use in making such comparison. If such numbers are not identical,
if there is reason to believe further inspection is necessary, or if the
inspection is for a Nebraska assigned number, the person performing the
inspection shall make a further inspection of the vehicle which may include,
but shall not be limited to, examination of other identifying numbers placed on
the vehicle by the manufacturer and an inquiry into the numbering system used
by the state issuing such ownership records to determine ownership of a
vehicle. The identification inspection shall also include a statement that the
vehicle identification number has been checked for entry in (i) the National
Crime Information Center and (ii) the Nebraska Crime Information Service or the
National Motor Vehicle Title Information System. In the case of an assembled
vehicle, a vehicle designated as reconstructed, or a vehicle designated as
replica, the identification inspection shall include, but not be limited to, an
examination of the records showing the date of receipt and source of each major
component part. No identification inspection shall be conducted unless all
major component parts are properly attached to the vehicle in the correct
location.
(b) Each county sheriff shall establish a process by which to enter into
an agreement with any motor vehicle dealer as defined in section 60-1401.26
with an established place of business as defined in section 60-1401.15 in the
county in which the sheriff has jurisdiction in order to collect information
for the identification inspection on motor vehicles which are in the inventory
of the motor vehicle dealer at the dealer's established place of business in
such county. The agreement entered into shall require that the motor vehicle
dealer provide the required fee, a copy of the documents evidencing transfer of
-3-

LB97 LB97
2025 2025
ownership, and the make, model, vehicle identification number, and odometer
reading in a form and manner prescribed by the county sheriff, which shall
include a requirement to provide one or more photographs or digital images of
the vehicle, the vehicle identification number, and the odometer reading. The
county sheriff shall complete the identification inspection as required under
subdivision (a) of this subsection using such information and return to the
motor vehicle dealer the statement that an identification inspection has been
conducted for each motor vehicle as provided in subsection (3) of this section.
If the information is incomplete or if there is reason to believe that further
inspection is necessary, the county sheriff shall inform the motor vehicle
dealer. If the motor vehicle dealer knowingly provides inaccurate or false
information, the motor vehicle dealer shall be liable for any damages that
result from the provision of such information. The motor vehicle dealer shall
keep the records for five years after the date the identification inspection is
complete.
(5) If there is cause to believe that odometer fraud exists, written
notification shall be given to the office of the Attorney General. If after
such inspection the sheriff or his or her designee determines that the vehicle
is not the vehicle described by the ownership records, no statement shall be
issued.
(6) The county treasurer or the department may also request an
identification inspection of a vehicle to determine if it meets the definition
of motor vehicle as defined in section 60-123.
Sec. 13. Section 60-158, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
60-158 (1) For each identification inspection conducted by the patrol, the
fee shall be ten dollars, which shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for
credit to the Nebraska State Patrol Cash Fund.
(2) For each identification inspection conducted by a county sheriff, the
fee shall be ten dollars, which shall be paid to the county treasurer and
credited to the county sheriff's vehicle inspection account within the county
general fund.
(3) For each identification inspection conducted by the department, the
fee shall be ten dollars, which shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for
credit to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund.
(4) There shall be no fee for an identification inspection when the
ownership document presented is a United States Government Certificate to
Obtain Title to a Vehicle.
Sec. 14. Section 60-167, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
60-167 (1) The department shall issue a bonded certificate of title to an
applicant who:
(a) Presents evidence reasonably sufficient to satisfy the department of
the applicant's ownership of the vehicle or security interest in the vehicle;
(b) Provides a statement that an identification inspection has been
conducted pursuant to section 60-146;
(c) Pays the fee as prescribed in section 60-160; and
(d) Files a bond in a form prescribed by the department and executed by
the applicant; and .
(e) Provides proof that written notice as prescribed in subsection (6) of
this section has been provided to each party with a secured interest in the
vehicle.
(2) The bond shall be issued by a surety company authorized to transact
business in this state, in an amount equal to one and one-half times the value
of the vehicle as determined by the department using reasonable appraisal
methods, and conditioned to indemnify any prior owner and secured party, any
subsequent purchaser and secured party, and any successor of the purchaser and
secured party for any expense, loss, or damage, including reasonable attorney's
fees, incurred by reason of the issuance of the certificate of title to the
vehicle or any defect in or undisclosed security interest upon the right,
title, and interest of the applicant in and to the vehicle. An interested
person may have a cause of action to recover on the bond for a breach of the
conditions of the bond. The aggregate liability of the surety to all persons
having a claim shall not exceed the amount of the bond.
(3) At the end of three years after the issuance of the bond, the holder
of the certificate of title may apply to the department on a form prescribed by
the department for the release of the bond and the removal of the notice
required by subsection (4) of this section if no claim has been made on the
bond. The department may release the bond at the end of three years after the
issuance of the bond if all questions as to the ownership of the vehicle have
been answered to the satisfaction of the department unless the department has
been notified of the pendency of an action to recover on the bond. If the
currently valid certificate of title is surrendered to the department, the
department may release the bond prior to the end of the three-year period.
(4) The department shall include the following statement on a bonded
certificate of title issued pursuant to this section and any subsequent title
issued as a result of a title transfer while the bond is in effect:
NOTICE: THIS VEHICLE MAY BE SUBJECT TO AN UNDISCLOSED INTEREST, BOND
NUMBER ...... .
(5) The department shall recall a bonded certificate of title if the
department finds that the application for the title contained a false
statement, if the applicant did not provide written notice to each party with a
secured interest in the vehicle, or if a check presented by the applicant for a
-4-

LB97 LB97
2025 2025
bonded certificate of title is returned uncollected by a financial institution.
(6)(a) Any applicant for a bonded certificate of title shall provide
written notice to any party with a secured interest in the vehicle that is the
subject of the application. Such written notice shall be provided to the last-
known address of each such party through certified mail with return receipt
requested and shall include a notice that the security interest will be
discharged if the party fails to respond to the notice. If the lienholder
responds, the response shall be presented to the department along with the
written notice and certified mail receipt.
(b) Issuance of a bonded title shall extinguish any lien or security
interest regarding a vehicle for which the notice in subdivision (a) of this
subsection was provided if the lienholder does not respond to such notice
within thirty days after receiving the notice.
Sec. 15. Section 60-168, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
60-168 (1) In the event of a lost or mutilated certificate of title, the
owner of the vehicle or the holder of a lien on the vehicle shall apply, upon a
form prescribed by the department, to the department or to any county treasurer
for a duplicate certificate of title and shall pay the fee prescribed by
section 60-156. The application shall be signed and sworn to by the person
making the application or a person authorized to sign under section 60-151.
Thereupon the county treasurer, with the approval of the department, or the
department shall issue a duplicate certificate of title to the person entitled
to receive the certificate of title. If the records of the title have been
destroyed pursuant to section 60-152, the county treasurer shall issue a
duplicate certificate of title to the person entitled to receive the same upon
such showing as the county treasurer may deem sufficient. If the applicant
cannot produce such proof of ownership, he or she may apply directly to the
department and submit such evidence as he or she may have, and the department
may, if it finds the evidence sufficient, authorize the county treasurer to
issue a duplicate certificate of title. A duplicate certificate of title so
issued shall show only those unreleased liens of record. The new purchaser
shall be entitled to receive an original certificate of title upon presentation
of the assigned duplicate copy of the certificate of title, properly assigned
to the new purchaser, to the county treasurer prescribed in section 60-144.
(2) Any purchaser of a vehicle for which a certificate of title was lost
or mutilated may at the time of purchase require the seller of the same to
indemnify him or her and all subsequent purchasers of the vehicle against any
loss which he, she, or they may suffer by reason of any claim presented upon
the original certificate. In the event of the recovery of the original
certificate of title by the owner, he or she shall forthwith surrender the same
to the county treasurer or the department for cancellation.
Sec. 16. Section 60-169, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
60-169 (1)(a)(i) (1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c) of
this subsection, each owner of a junk vehicle and each person mentioned as
owner in the last certificate of title for any junk vehicle , when the vehicle
is dismantled, destroyed, or changed in such a manner that it loses its
character as a vehicle or changed in such a manner that it is not the vehicle
described in the certificate of title, shall surrender his or her certificate
of title to any county treasurer or to the department.
(ii) A If the certificate of title is surrendered to a county treasurer,
he or she shall, with the consent of any holders of any liens noted thereon,
enter a cancellation upon the records and shall notify the department of such
cancellation. Beginning on the implementation date designated by the director
pursuant to subsection (3) of section 60-1508, a wrecker or salvage dealer
shall report electronically to the department using the electronic reporting
system.
(iii) For any certificate of title surrendered under subdivision (1)(a) of
this section, the department If the certificate is surrendered to the
department, it shall, with the consent of any holder of any lien noted thereon,
enter a cancellation of such certificate of title upon its records.
(b) This subdivision applies to all licensed wrecker or salvage dealers
and, except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, to each vehicle located
on the premises of such dealer. For each vehicle required to be reported under
28 C.F.R. 25.56, as such regulation existed on January 1, 2024, the information
obtained by the department under this section may be reported to the National
Motor Vehicle Title Information System in a format that will satisfy the
requirement for reporting under 28 C.F.R. 25.56, as such regulation existed on
January 1, 2024. Such report shall include:
(i) The name, address, and contact information for the reporting entity;
(ii) The vehicle identification number;
(iii) The date the reporting entity obtained such motor vehicle;
(iv) The name of the person from whom such motor vehicle was obtained, for
use only by a law enforcement or other appropriate government agency;
(v) A statement of whether the motor vehicle was or will be crushed,
disposed of, offered for sale, or used for another purpose; and
(vi) Whether the motor vehicle is intended for export outside of the
United States.
The department may set and collect a fee, not to exceed the cost of
reporting to the National Motor Vehicle Title Information System, from wrecker
or salvage dealers for electronic reporting to the National Motor Vehicle Title
Information System, which shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit
-5-

LB97 LB97
2025 2025
to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund. This subdivision does not apply
to any vehicle reported by a wrecker or salvage dealer to the National Motor
Vehicle Title Information System as required under 28 C.F.R. 25.56, as such
regulation existed on January 1, 2024.
(c)(i) In the case of a mobile home or manufactured home for which a
certificate of title has been issued, if such mobile home or manufactured home
is affixed to real property in which each owner of the mobile home or
manufactured home has any ownership interest, the certificate of title may be
surrendered for cancellation to the county treasurer of the county where such
mobile home or manufactured home is affixed to real property if at the time of
surrender the owner submits to the county treasurer an affidavit of affixture
on a form provided by the department that contains all of the following, as
applicable:
(A) The names and addresses of all of the owners of record of the mobile
home or manufactured home;
(B) A description of the mobile home or manufactured home that includes
the name of the manufacturer, the year of manufacture, the model, and the
manufacturer's serial number;
(C) The legal description of the real property upon which the mobile home
or manufactured home is affixed and the names of all of the owners of record of
the real property;
(D) A statement that the mobile home or manufactured home is affixed to
the real property;
(E) The written consent of each holder of a lien duly noted on the
certificate of title to the release of such lien and the cancellation of the
certificate of title;
(F) A copy of the certificate of title surrendered for cancellation; and
(G) The name and address of an owner, a financial institution, or another
entity to which notice of cancellation of the certificate of title may be
delivered.
(ii) The person submitting an affidavit of affixture pursuant to
subdivision (c)(i) of this subsection shall swear or affirm that all statements
in the affidavit are true and material and further acknowledge that any false
statement in the affidavit may subject the person to penalties relating to
perjury under section 28-915.
(2) If a certificate of title of a mobile home or manufactured home is
surrendered to the county treasurer, along with the affidavit required by
subdivision (1)(c) of this section, he or she shall enter a cancellation upon
his or her records, notify the department of such cancellation, forward a
duplicate original of the affidavit to the department, and deliver a duplicate
original of the executed affidavit under subdivision (1)(c) of this section to
the register of deeds for the county in which the real property is located to
be filed by the register of deeds. The county treasurer shall be entitled to
collect fees from the person submitting the affidavit in accordance with
section 33-109 to cover the costs of filing such affidavit. Following the
cancellation of a certificate of title for a mobile home or manufactured home,
the county treasurer or designated county official shall not issue a
certificate of title for such mobile home or manufactured home, except as
provided in subsection (5) of this section.
(3) If a mobile home or manufactured home is affixed to real estate before
June 1, 2006, a person who is the holder of a lien or security interest in both
the mobile home or manufactured home and the real estate to which it is affixed
on such date may enforce its liens or security interests by accepting a deed in
lieu of foreclosure or in the manner provided by law for enforcing liens on the
real estate.
(4) A mobile home or manufactured home for which the certificate of title
has been canceled and for which an affidavit of affixture has been duly
recorded pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall be treated as part of
the real estate upon which such mobile home or manufactured home is located.
Any lien thereon shall be perfected and enforced in the same manner as a lien
on real estate. The owner of such mobile home or manufactured home may convey
ownership of the mobile home or manufactured home only as a part of the real
estate to which it is affixed.
(5)(a) If each owner of both the mobile home or manufactured home and the
real estate described in subdivision (1)(c) of this section intends to detach
the mobile home or manufactured home from the real estate, the owner shall do
both of the following: (i) Before detaching the mobile home or manufactured
home, record an affidavit of detachment in the office of the register of deeds
in the county in which the affidavit is recorded under subdivision (1)(c) of
this section; and (ii) apply for a certificate of title for the mobile home or
manufactured home pursuant to section 60-147.
(b) The affidavit of detachment shall contain all of the following:
(i) The names and addresses of all of the owners of record of the mobile
home or manufactured home;
(ii) A description of the mobile home or manufactured home that includes
the name of the manufacturer, the year of manufacture, the model, and the
manufacturer's serial number;
(iii) The legal description of the real estate from which the mobile home
or manufactured home is to be detached and the names of all of the owners of
record of the real estate;
(iv) A statement that the mobile home or manufactured home is to be
detached from the real property;
(v) A statement that the certificate of title of the mobile home or
-6-

LB97 LB97
2025 2025
manufactured home has previously been canceled;
(vi) The name of each holder of a lien of record against the real estate
from which the mobile home or manufactured home is to be detached, with the
written consent of each holder to the detachment; and
(vii) The name and address of an owner, a financial institution, or
another entity to which the certificate of title may be delivered.
(6) An owner of an affixed mobile home or manufactured home for which the
certificate of title has previously been canceled pursuant to subsection (2) of
this section shall not detach the mobile home or manufactured home from the
real estate before a certificate of title for the mobile home or manufactured
home is issued by the county treasurer or department. If a certificate of title
is issued by the county treasurer or department, the mobile home or
manufactured home is no longer considered part of the real property. Any lien
thereon shall be perfected pursuant to section 60-164. The owner of such mobile
home or manufactured home may convey ownership of the mobile home or
manufactured home only by way of a certificate of title.
(7) For purposes of this section:
(a) A mobile home or manufactured home is affixed to real estate if the
wheels, towing hitches, and running gear are removed and it is permanently
attached to a foundation or other support system; and
(b) Ownership interest means the fee simple interest in real estate or an
interest as the lessee under a lease of the real property that has a term that
continues for at least twenty years after the recording of the affidavit under
subsection (2) of this section.
(8) Upon cancellation of a certificate of title in the manner prescribed
by this section, the county treasurer and the department may cancel and destroy
all certificates and all memorandum certificates in that chain of title.
Sec. 17. Section 60-337, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
60-337 (1) Minibike means a two-wheel motor vehicle that:
(a) Has which has a total wheel and tire diameter of less than fourteen
inches; or
(b) Has an engine-rated capacity of less than forty-five cubic centimeters
displacement;
(c) Has an engine power output of less than three horsepower;
(d) Has an engine-rated capacity of less than two thousand two hundred
thirty-eight watts; or
(e) Was or any other two-wheel motor vehicle primarily designed by the
manufacturer for off-road use only.
(2) Minibike shall not include an electric personal assistive mobility
device.
Sec. 18. Section 60-392, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
60-392 (1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, registration may
be renewed annually in a manner designated by the department and upon payment
of the same fee as provided for the original registration. On making an
application for renewal, the registration certificate for the preceding
registration period or renewal notice or other evidence designated by the
department shall be presented with the application. A person may renew an
annual registration up to thirty days prior to the date of expiration.
(2) The certificate of registration and license plates issued by the
department shall be valid during the registration period for which they are
issued, and when validation decals issued pursuant to section 60-3,101 have
been affixed to the license plates, the plates shall also be valid for the
registration period designated by such validation decals. If a person renews an
annual registration up to thirty days prior to the date of expiration, the
registration shall be valid for such time period as well.
(3) The registration period for motor vehicles and trailers required to be
registered as provided in section 60-362 shall expire on the first day of the
month one year from the month of issuance, and renewal shall become due on such
day and shall become delinquent on the first day of the following month.
(4) Subsections (1) through (3) of this section do not apply to dealer's
license plates, repossession plates, and transporter plates as provided in
sections 60-373, 60-375, 60-378, and 60-379, which plates shall be issued for a
calendar year.
(5)(a) This subsection applies beginning on an implementation date
designated by the director on or before January 1, 2029.
(b) For any registration issued pursuant to subsections (1) through (4) of
this section, a person may opt to register for an annual period or for a
multiyear period of two or three years.
(c) At the time of registration renewal for a multiyear period, fees and
taxes shall be paid for each year of the multiyear renewal including the fees
provided for in sections 60-3,141 and 60-3,156.
(6) (5) The registration period for apportioned vehicles as provided in
section 60-3,198 shall be renewed monthly, quarterly, or annually at the
discretion of the director. Such registration period expires on the last day of
the registration period and renewal is delinquent on the first day of the
second full month following such expiration date. The department may adopt and
promulgate rules and regulations to establish a staggered registration system
for apportioned vehicles registered pursuant to section 60-3,198, including the
collection of eighteen or fewer months of registration fees.
Sec. 19. Section 60-399, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
-7-

LB97 LB97
2025 2025
60-399 (1) Except as otherwise specifically provided, no person shall
operate or park or cause to be operated or parked a motor vehicle or tow or
park or cause to be towed or parked a trailer on the highways unless such motor
vehicle or trailer has displayed the proper number of plates as required in the
Motor Vehicle Registration Act.
(2) In each registration period in which new license plates are not
issued, previously issued license plates shall have affixed thereto the
validation decals issued pursuant to section 60-3,101. In all cases such
license plates shall be securely fastened in an upright position to the motor
vehicle or trailer so as to prevent such plates from swinging and at a minimum
distance of twelve inches from the ground to the bottom of the license plate.
No person shall attach to or display on such motor vehicle or trailer any (a)
license plate or registration certificate other than as assigned to it for the
current registration period, (b) fictitious or altered license plates or
registration certificate, (c) license plates or registration certificate that
has been canceled by the department, or (d) license plates lacking current
validation decals.
(3) (2) All letters, numbers, printing, writing, and other identification
marks upon such plates and certificate shall be kept clear and distinct and
free from grease, dust, or other blurring matter, so that they shall be plainly
visible at all times during daylight and under artificial light in the
nighttime.
(4) Addition, removal, or modification of design, color, or appearance of
any such license plate is prohibited while it is displayed on the vehicle to
which it is assigned.
Sec. 20. Section 60-3,100, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
60-3,100 (1) The department shall issue to every person whose motor
vehicle or trailer is registered one or two fully reflectorized license plates
upon which shall be displayed (a) the registration number consisting of letters
and numerals assigned to such motor vehicle or trailer in figures not less than
two and one-half inches nor more than three inches in height and (b) also the
word Nebraska suitably lettered so as to be attractive. The license plates
shall be of a color designated by the director. The color of the plates shall
be changed each time the license plates are changed. Each time the license
plates are changed, the director shall secure competitive bids for materials
pursuant to the State Procurement Act. Autocycle, motorcycle, minitruck, low-
speed vehicle, and trailer license plate letters and numerals may be one-half
the size of those required in this section.
(2)(a) This subsection applies on and before December 31, 2028.
(b) (2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, two license
plates shall be issued for every motor vehicle.
(c) (b) One license plate shall be issued for (i) apportionable vehicles,
(ii) buses, (iii) dealers, (iv) minitrucks, (v) motorcycles, other than
autocycles, (vi) special interest motor vehicles that use the special interest
motor vehicle license plate authorized by and issued under section 60-3,135.01,
(vii) trailers, and (viii) truck-tractors.
(d)(i) (c)(i) One license plate shall be issued, upon request and
compliance with this subdivision, for any passenger car which is not
manufactured to be equipped with a bracket on the front of the vehicle to
display a license plate. A license decal shall be issued with the license plate
as provided in subdivision (ii) of this subdivision and shall be displayed on
the driver's side of the windshield. In order to request a single license plate
and license decal, there shall be an additional annual nonrefundable
registration fee of fifty dollars plus the cost of the decal paid to the county
treasurer at the time of registration. All fees collected under this
subdivision shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Highway
Trust Fund.
(ii) The department shall design, procure, and furnish to the county
treasurers a license decal which shall be displayed as evidence that a license
plate has been obtained under this subdivision. Each county treasurer shall
furnish a license decal to the person obtaining the plate.
(e) (d) When two license plates are issued, one shall be prominently
displayed at all times on the front and one on the rear of the registered motor
vehicle or trailer. When only one plate is issued, it shall be prominently
displayed on the rear of the registered motor vehicle or trailer. When only one
plate is issued for motor vehicles registered pursuant to section 60-3,198 and
truck-tractors, it shall be prominently displayed on the front of the
apportionable vehicle.
(3)(a) This subsection applies on and after January 1, 2029.
(b) One license plate shall be issued for every registered motor vehicle
or trailer.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the license plate for
a registered motor vehicle or trailer shall be prominently displayed on the
rear of the registered motor vehicle or trailer.
(d) When a license plate is issued for motor vehicles registered pursuant
to section 60-3,198 and truck-tractors, such license plate shall be prominently
displayed on the front of the apportionable vehicle or truck-tractor.
(4)(a) The director shall designate an implementation date for this
subsection that is on or before January 1, 2029. Beginning on such
implementation date, the department may deliver any license plate or
registration certificate to the applicant or to the county treasurer of the
county in which the motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer is registered by
-8-

LB97 LB97
2025 2025
United States mail or through an alternative shipping service. The delivery of
such license plate or registration certificate shall be made through a secure
process.
(b) If delivery of any license plate or registration certificate is made
by the department to the applicant, the department may charge a postage and
handling fee in an amount not more than necessary to recover the cost of
postage and handling for the specific items mailed to the applicant. The
department shall remit the fee to the State Treasurer for credit to the
Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund.
(5) Any person who presents proof of registration shall be permitted to
operate the registered motor vehicle or tow the registered trailer for a period
of thirty days without a mailed license plate displayed.
Sec. 21. Section 60-3,101, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
60-3,101 (1) License plates shall be issued every six years beginning with
the license plates issued in the year 2005.
(2) In the years in which license plates are not issued, in lieu of
issuing such license plates, the department shall furnish to every person whose
motor vehicle or trailer is registered one or two validation decals, as the
case may be. Such validation decals shall bear the year for which issued and be
so constructed as to permit them to be permanently affixed to the license
plates.
(3) This section shall not apply to license plates issued pursuant to
sections 60-3,203 and 60-3,228.
Sec. 22. Section 60-3,102, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
60-3,102 (1) Whenever new license plates, including duplicate or
replacement license plates, are issued to any person, a fee per plate shall be
charged in addition to all other required fees. The license plate fee shall be
determined by the department and shall only cover the cost of the license plate
and validation decals but shall not exceed eight dollars. :
(a) Three dollars and fifty cents through December 31, 2022; and
(b) Four dollars and twenty-five cents beginning January 1, 2023.
(2) All fees collected pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the
State Treasurer for credit to the Highway Trust Fund. Beginning with the 2029
license plate issuance cycle, all fees collected pursuant to this section shall
be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the License Plate Cash Fund.
(3) This section shall not apply to license plates issued pursuant to
section 60-3,122, 60-3,122.02, 60-3,123, 60-3,124, or 60-3,125.
Sec. 23. Section 60-3,157, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-3,157 If a license plate, or registration certificate, or weight or
validation decal is lost or mutilated or has become illegible, the person to
whom such license plate, and registration certificate, or decal has been issued
shall immediately apply to the county treasurer for a duplicate registration
certificate or for new license plates and decals, accompanying his or her
application with a fee of one dollar for a duplicate registration certificate
and a fee of two dollars and fifty cents for a duplicate or replacement license
plate and decals. No fee shall be required under this section if the vehicle or
trailer was reported stolen under section 60-178.
Sec. 24. Section 60-4,113, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-4,113 (1) The director shall appoint as his or her agents one or more
department personnel who shall examine all applicants for a state
identification card or an operator's license as provided in section 60-4,114,
except as otherwise provided in subsection (8) of section 60-4,122. The same
department personnel may be assigned to one or more counties by the director.
In counties in which the county treasurer collects the fees and issues
receipts, the county shall furnish office space for the administration of the
operator's license examination. Department personnel shall conduct the
examination of applicants and deliver to each successful applicant an issuance
certificate or receipt. The certificate may be presented to the county
treasurer within ninety days after issuance, and the county treasurer shall
collect the fees fee and surcharge as provided in section 60-4,115 and issue a
receipt which is valid for up to thirty days. If an operator's license is being
issued, the receipt shall also authorize driving privileges for such thirty-day
period. If department personnel refuse to issue an issuance certificate or
receipt, the department personnel shall state such cause in writing and deliver
such written cause to the applicant.
(2) The department may provide for the central production and issuance of
operators' licenses and state identification cards. Production shall take place
at a secure production facility designated by the director. The licenses and
cards shall be of such a design and produced in such a way as to discourage, to
the maximum extent possible, fraud in applicant enrollment, identity theft, and
the forgery and counterfeiting of such licenses and cards. Delivery of an
operator's license or state identification card shall be to the mailing address
provided by the applicant at the time of application and may be provided by
secure electronic delivery to specified contact information at the request of
the applicant.
Sec. 25. Section 60-4,115, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
60-4,115 (1) Fees for operators' licenses and state identification cards
shall be collected by department personnel or the county treasurer and
-9-

LB97 LB97
2025 2025
distributed according to the table in subsection (2) of this section, except
for the ignition interlock permit and associated fees as outlined in subsection
(4) of this section and the 24/7 sobriety program permit and associated fees as
outlined in subsection (5) of this section. County officials shall remit the
county portion of the fees collected to the county treasurer for placement in
the county general fund. All other fees collected shall be remitted to the
State Treasurer for credit to the appropriate fund.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (7) of this section, the
fees provided in this subsection in the following dollar amounts apply for
operators' licenses and state identification cards.
Department
County of Motor
Document Total General Vehicles
Fee Fund Cash Fund
State identification card:
Valid for 1 year or less 5.00 2.75 2.25
Valid for more than 1 year
but not more than 2 years 10.00 2.75 7.25
Valid for more than 2 years
but not more than 3 years 14.00 2.75 11.25
Valid for more than 3 years
but not more than 4 years 19.00 2.75 16.25
Valid for more than 4 years
for a person under 21 24.00 2.75 21.25
Valid for 5 years 24.00 3.50 20.50
Replacement 11.00 2.75 8.25
Class O or M operator's license:
Valid for 1 year or less 5.00 2.75 2.25
Valid for more than 1 year
but not more than 2 years 10.00 2.75 7.25
Valid for more than 2 years
but not more than 3 years 14.00 2.75 11.25
Valid for more than 3 years
but not more than 4 years 19.00 2.75 16.25
Valid for 5 years 24.00 3.50 20.50
Bioptic or telescopic lens
restriction:
Valid for 1 year or less 5.00 0 5.00
Valid for more than 1 year
but not more than 2 years 10.00 2.75 7.25
Replacement 11.00 2.75 8.25
Add, change, or remove class,
endorsement, or restriction 5.00 0 5.00
Provisional operator's permit:
-10-

LB97 LB97
2025 2025
Original 15.00 2.75 12.25
Bioptic or telescopic lens
restriction:
Valid for 1 year or less 5.00 0 5.00
Valid for more than 1 year
but not more than 2 years 15.00 2.75 12.25
Replacement 11.00 2.75 8.25
Add, change, or remove class,
endorsement, or restriction 5.00 0 5.00
LPD-learner's permit:
Original 8.00 .25 7.75
Replacement 11.00 2.75 8.25
Add, change, or remove class,
endorsement, or restriction 5.00 0 5.00
LPE-learner's permit:
Original 8.00 .25 7.75
Replacement 11.00 2.75 8.25
Add, change, or remove class,
endorsement, or restriction 5.00 0 5.00
School permit:
Original 8.00 .25 7.75
Replacement 11.00 2.75 8.25
Add, change, or remove class,
endorsement, or restriction 5.00 0 5.00
Farm permit:
Original or renewal 5.00 .25 4.75
Replacement 5.00 .25 4.75
Add, change, or remove class,
endorsement, or restriction 5.00 0 5.00
Driving permits:
Employment 45.00 0 45.00
Medical hardship 45.00 0 45.00
Replacement 10.00 .25 9.75
Add, change, or remove class,
endorsement, or restriction 5.00 0 5.00
Commercial driver's license:
Valid for 1 year or less 11.00 1.75 9.25
Valid for more than 1 year
but not more than 2 years 22.00 1.75 20.25
-11-

LB97 LB97
2025 2025
Valid for more than 2 years
but not more than 3 years 33.00 1.75 31.25
Valid for more than 3 years
but not more than 4 years 44.00 1.75 42.25
Valid for 5 years 55.00 1.75 53.25
Bioptic or telescopic lens
restriction:
Valid for one year or less 11.00 1.75 9.25
Valid for more than 1 year
but not more than 2 years 22.00 1.75 20.25
Replacement 11.00 2.75 8.25
Add, change, or remove class,
endorsement, or restriction 10.00 1.75 8.25
CLP-commercial learner's permit:
Original 10.00 .25 9.75
Replacement 10.00 .25 9.75
Add, change, or remove class,
endorsement, or restriction 10.00 .25 9.75
(3) If the department issues an operator's license or a state
identification card and collects the fees, the department shall remit the
county portion of the fees to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department
of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund.
(4)(a) The fee for an ignition interlock permit shall be forty-five
dollars. Five dollars of the fee shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for
credit to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund. Forty dollars of the fee
shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of Motor
Vehicles Ignition Interlock Fund.
(b) The fee for a replacement ignition interlock permit shall be eleven
dollars. Two dollars and seventy-five cents of the fee shall be remitted to the
county treasurer for credit to the county general fund. Eight dollars and
twenty-five cents of the fee shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for
credit to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund.
(c) The fee for adding, changing, or removing a class, endorsement, or
restriction on an ignition interlock permit shall be five dollars. The fee
shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of Motor
Vehicles Cash Fund.
(5)(a) The fee for a 24/7 sobriety program permit shall be forty-five
dollars. Forty dollars of the fee shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for
credit to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund. Five dollars of the fee
shall be remitted to the county treasurer for credit to the county general
fund.
(b) The fee for a replacement 24/7 sobriety program permit shall be eleven
dollars. Two dollars and seventy-five cents of the fee shall be remitted to the
county treasurer for credit to the county general fund. Eight dollars and
twenty-five cents of the fee shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for
credit to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund.
(c) The fee for adding, changing, or removing a class, endorsement, or
restriction on a 24/7 sobriety program permit shall be five dollars. The fee
shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of Motor
Vehicles Cash Fund.
(6) The department and its agents may collect an identity security fee
surcharge to cover the cost of security and technology practices used to
protect the identity of applicants for and holders of operators' licenses and
state identification cards and to reduce identity theft, fraud, and forgery and
counterfeiting of such licenses and cards to the maximum extent possible. The
fee surcharge shall be in addition to all other required fees for operators'
licenses and state identification cards. The amount of the fee surcharge shall
be determined by the department. The fee surcharge shall not exceed eight
dollars. The fee surcharge shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit
to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund.
(7) No fee shall be charged for issuance of an original, renewal, or
replacement state identification card to a resident of Nebraska who is also a
United States citizen and who does not have a valid Nebraska driver's license.
-12-

LB97 LB97
2025 2025
Sec. 26. Section 60-4,117, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-4,117 (1) An applicant shall present an issuance certificate to the
county treasurer for an operator's license or state identification card.
Department personnel or the county treasurer shall collect the applicable fees
fee and surcharge as prescribed in section 60-4,115 and issue a receipt which
is valid for up to thirty days. If there is cause for an operator's license to
be issued, the receipt shall also authorize driving privileges for such thirty-
day period. The license or card shall be delivered as provided in section
60-4,113.
(2) The operator's license and state identification card shall be in a
form prescribed by the department. The license and card may include security
features prescribed by the department. The license and card shall be
conspicuously marked Nebraska Operator's License or Nebraska Identification
Card, shall be, to the maximum extent practicable, tamper and forgery proof,
and shall include the following information:
(a) The full legal name and principal residence address of the holder;
(b) The holder's full facial digital image;
(c) A physical description of the holder, including gender, height,
weight, and eye and hair colors;
(d) The holder's date of birth;
(e) The holder's signature;
(f) The class of motor vehicle which the holder is authorized to operate
and any applicable endorsements or restrictions;
(g) The issuance and expiration date of the license or card;
(h) The organ and tissue donation information specified in section 60-494;
(i) A veteran designation as provided in section 60-4,189; and
(j) Such other marks and information as the director may determine.
(3) Each operator's license and state identification card shall contain
the following encoded, machine-readable information: The holder's full legal
name; date of birth; gender; race or ethnicity; document issue date; document
expiration date; principal residence address; unique identification number;
revision date; inventory control number; and state of issuance.
Sec. 27. Section 60-4,118.06, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-4,118.06 (1) Upon receipt by the director of (a) a certified copy of a
court order issued pursuant to section 60-6,211.05, a certified copy of an
order for installation of an ignition interlock device and issuance of an
ignition interlock permit pursuant to section 60-6,197.03, or a copy of an
order from the Board of Pardons pursuant to section 83-1,127.02, or beginning
January 1, 2026, a certified copy of a court order or administrative license
revocation order from another jurisdiction that substantially complies with
sections 60-6,197.03 and 60-6,211.05 and sufficient proof of residence in this
state, (b) sufficient evidence that the person has surrendered his or her
operator's license to the department and installed an approved ignition
interlock device in accordance with such order, and (c) payment of the fee
provided in section 60-4,115, such person may apply for an ignition interlock
permit. A person subject to administrative license revocation under sections
60-498.01 to 60-498.04 shall be eligible for an ignition interlock permit as
provided in such sections. The director shall issue an ignition interlock
permit only for the operation of a motor vehicle equipped with an ignition
interlock device. All permits issued pursuant to this subsection shall indicate
that the permit is not valid for the operation of any commercial motor vehicle.
(2) Upon expiration of the revocation period or upon expiration of an
order issued by the Board of Pardons pursuant to section 83-1,127.02, a person
may apply to the department in writing for issuance of an operator's license.
Regardless of whether the license surrendered by such person under subsection
(1) of this section has expired, the person shall apply for a new operator's
license pursuant to the Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act.
(3) (3)(a) An ignition interlock permit shall not be issued under this
section or sections 60-498.01 to 60-498.04 to any person except in cases of a
violation of subdivision (3)(b) or (c) of section 28-306, subdivision (3)(b) or
(c) of section 28-394, or section 28-1254, 60-6,196, 60-6,197, 60-6,197.06, or
60-6,198.
(b) An ignition interlock permit shall only be available to a holder of a
Class M or O operator's license.
(4) The director shall revoke a person's ignition interlock permit issued
under this section or sections 60-498.01 to 60-498.04 upon receipt of an (a)
abstract of conviction indicating that the person had his or her operating
privileges revoked or canceled or (b) administrative order revoking or
canceling the person's operating privileges, if such conviction or order
resulted from an incident other than the incident which resulted in the
application for the ignition interlock permit.
Sec. 28. Section 60-4,120, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
60-4,120 (1) Any person duly licensed or holding a valid state
identification card issued under the Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act who
loses his or her operator's license or card may make application to the
department for a replacement license or card.
(2) If any person changes his or her name because of marriage or divorce
or by court order or a common-law name change, he or she shall apply to the
department for a replacement operator's license or state identification card
and furnish proof of identification in accordance with section 60-484. If any
-13-

LB97 LB97
2025 2025
person changes his or her address, the person shall apply to the department for
a replacement operator's license or state identification card and furnish
satisfactory evidence of such change. The application shall be made within
sixty days after the change of name or address.
(3) In the event a mutilated or unreadable operator's license is held by
any person duly licensed under the act or a mutilated or unreadable state
identification card which was issued under the act is held by a person, such
person may obtain a replacement license or card. Upon report of the mutilated
or unreadable license or card and application for a replacement license or
card, a replacement license or card may be issued if the department is
satisfied that the original license or card is mutilated or unreadable.
(4) If any person duly licensed under the act loses his or her operator's
license or if any holder of a state identification card loses his or her card
while temporarily out of the state, he or she may make application to the
department for a replacement operator's license or card by applying to the
department and reporting such loss. Upon receipt of a correctly completed
application, the department shall cause to be issued a replacement operator's
license or card.
(5) Any person who holds a valid operator's license or state
identification card without a digital image shall surrender such license or
card to the department within thirty days after resuming residency in this
state. After the thirty-day period, such license or card shall be considered
invalid and no license or card shall be issued until the individual has made
application for replacement or renewal.
(6) Application for a replacement operator's license or state
identification card shall include the information required under sections
60-484, 60-484.04, and 60-484.07.
(7) An applicant may obtain a replacement operator's license or state
identification card pursuant to subsection (1) or (3) of this section by
electronic means in a manner prescribed by the department. No replacement
license or card shall be issued unless the applicant has a digital image and
digital signature preserved in the digital system.
(8) Each replacement operator's license or state identification card shall
be issued with the same expiration date as the license or card for which the
replacement is issued. The replacement license or card shall also state the new
issuance date. Upon issuance of any replacement license or card, the license or
card for which the replacement is issued shall be void.
(9) A replacement operator's license or state identification card issued
under this section shall be delivered to the applicant as provided in section
60-4,113 after the county treasurer or department collects the fees fee and
surcharge prescribed in section 60-4,115 and issues the applicant a receipt
with driving privileges which is valid for up to thirty days. The receipt shall
contain the digital image of the applicant.
Sec. 29. Section 60-4,120.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-4,120.01 (1)(a) Any person who is at least sixteen years of age but
less than eighteen years of age may be issued a provisional operator's permit
by the Department of Motor Vehicles. The provisional operator's permit shall
expire on the applicant's eighteenth birthday.
(b) No provisional operator's permit shall be issued to any person unless
such person:
(i) Has possessed a valid LPD-learner's permit, LPE-learner's permit, or
SCP-school permit for at least a six-month period beginning on the date of
issuance of such person's LPD-learner's permit, LPE-learner's permit, or SCP-
school permit; and
(ii) Has not accumulated three or more points pursuant to section 60-4,182
during the six-month period immediately preceding the date of the application
for the provisional operator's permit.
(c) The requirements for the provisional operator's permit prescribed in
subdivisions (2)(a) and (b) of this section may be completed prior to the
applicant's sixteenth birthday. A person may apply for a provisional operator's
permit and take the driving test and the written examination, if required, at
any time within sixty days prior to his or her sixteenth birthday upon proof of
age in the manner provided in section 60-484.
(2) In order to obtain a provisional operator's permit, the applicant
shall present (a)(i) proof of successful completion of a department-approved
driver safety course which includes behind-the-wheel driving specifically
emphasizing (A) the effects of the consumption of alcohol on a person operating
a motor vehicle, (B) occupant protection systems, (C) risk assessment, and (D)
railroad crossing safety and (ii) proof of successful completion of a written
examination and driving test administered by a driver safety course instructor
or (b) a certificate in a form prescribed by the department, signed by a
parent, guardian, or licensed driver at least twenty-one years of age,
verifying that the applicant has completed fifty hours of lawful motor vehicle
operation including at least ten hours of motor vehicle operation between
sunset and sunrise, under conditions that reflect department-approved driver
safety course curriculum, with a parent, guardian, or adult at least twenty-one
years of age, who has a current Nebraska operator's license or who is licensed
in another state. If the applicant presents such a certificate, the applicant
shall be required to successfully complete a driving test administered by the
department. The written examination shall be waived if the applicant has been
issued a Nebraska LPD-learner's permit or has been issued a Nebraska LPE-
learner's permit and such permit is valid or has been expired for no more than
-14-

LB97 LB97
2025 2025
one year. However, the department shall not waive the written examination if
the provisional operator's permit being applied for contains a class or
endorsement which is different from the class or endorsement of the LPD-
learner's or LPE-learner's permit. Upon presentation by the applicant of a form
prescribed by the department showing successful completion of the driver safety
course, the written examination and driving test may be waived. Upon
presentation of the certificate, the written examination but not the driving
test may be waived. Licensing staff shall waive the written examination and the
driving test if the applicant has been issued a school permit and such permit
is valid or has expired no more than one year prior to application. The written
examination shall not be waived if the provisional operator's permit being
applied for contains a class or endorsement which is different from the class
or endorsement of the school permit.
(3)(a) The holder of a provisional operator's permit shall only operate a
motor vehicle on the highways of this state during the period beginning at 6
a.m. and ending at 12 midnight except when he or she is en route to or from his
or her residence to his or her place of employment or a school activity. The
holder of a provisional operator's permit may operate a motor vehicle on the
highways of this state at any hour of the day or night if accompanied by a
parent, guardian, or adult at least twenty-one years of age, who has a current
Nebraska operator's license or who is licensed in another state.
(b) The holder of a provisional operator's permit shall only operate a
motor vehicle on the highways of this state during the first six months of
holding the permit with no more than one passenger who is not an immediate
family member and who is under nineteen years of age.
(c) The holder of a provisional operator's permit shall not use any type
of interactive wireless communication device while operating a motor vehicle on
the highways of this state.
(d) Enforcement of subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection shall
be accomplished only as a secondary action when the holder of the provisional
operator's permit has been cited or charged with a violation of some other law.
(4) Department personnel or the county treasurer shall collect the fees
fee and surcharge prescribed in section 60-4,115 for the issuance of each
provisional operator's permit.
Sec. 30. Section 60-4,123, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-4,123 (1) Any person who is at least fifteen years of age may apply for
an LPD-learner's permit from the department. In order to obtain an LPD-
learner's permit, the applicant shall successfully complete a written
examination. A person may take the written examination beginning sixty days
prior to his or her fifteenth birthday but shall not be issued a permit until
he or she is fifteen years of age. The written examination may be waived for
any person who has been issued an LPE-learner's permit, LPD-learner's permit,
or SCP-school permit that has been expired for no more than one year.
(2) Upon successful completion of the written examination and the payment
of the fees a fee and surcharge as prescribed in section 60-4,115, the
applicant shall be issued an LPD-learner's permit as provided in section
60-4,113. The permit shall be valid for twelve months.
(3)(a) The holder of an LPD-learner's permit shall only operate a motor
vehicle on the highways of this state if he or she is accompanied at all times
by a licensed operator who is at least twenty-one years of age and who has been
licensed by this state or another state and if (i) for all motor vehicles other
than autocycles, motorcycles, or mopeds, he or she is actually occupying the
seat beside the licensed operator, (ii) in the case of an autocycle, he or she
is actually occupying the seat beside or in front of the licensed operator, or
(iii) in the case of a motorcycle, other than an autocycle, or a moped, he or
she is within visual contact of and under the supervision of, in the case of a
motorcycle, a licensed motorcycle operator or, in the case of a moped, a
licensed motor vehicle operator.
(b) The holder of an LPD-learner's permit shall not use any type of
interactive wireless communication device while operating a motor vehicle on
the highways of this state. Enforcement of this subdivision shall be
accomplished only as a secondary action when the holder of the LPD-learner's
permit has been cited or charged with a violation of some other law.
(4) Department personnel or the county treasurer shall collect the fees
fee and surcharge prescribed in section 60-4,115 for the issuance of each LPD-
learner's permit.
Sec. 31. Section 60-4,124, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
60-4,124 (1) A person who is younger than sixteen years and three months
of age but is older than fourteen years and two months of age may be issued a
school permit if such person either resides outside a city of the metropolitan,
primary, or first class or attends a school which is outside a city of the
metropolitan, primary, or first class and if such person has held an LPE-
learner's permit for two months. A school permit shall not be issued until such
person has demonstrated that he or she is capable of successfully operating a
motor vehicle, moped, or motorcycle and has in his or her possession an
issuance certificate authorizing the county treasurer to issue a school permit.
In order to obtain an issuance certificate, the applicant shall present (a)
proof of successful completion of a department-approved driver safety course
which includes behind-the-wheel driving specifically emphasizing (i) the
effects of the consumption of alcohol on a person operating a motor vehicle,
(ii) occupant protection systems, (iii) risk assessment, and (iv) railroad
-15-

LB97 LB97
2025 2025
crossing safety and (b)(i) proof of successful completion of a written
examination and driving test administered by a driver safety course instructor
or (ii) a certificate in a form prescribed by the department, signed by a
parent, guardian, or licensed driver at least twenty-one years of age,
verifying that the applicant has completed fifty hours of lawful motor vehicle
operation, under conditions that reflect department-approved driver safety
course curriculum, with a parent, guardian, or adult at least twenty-one years
of age, who has a current Nebraska operator's license or who is licensed in
another state. The department may waive the written examination if the
applicant has been issued an LPE-learner's permit or LPD-learner's permit and
if such permit is valid or has expired no more than one year prior to
application. The written examination shall not be waived if the permit being
applied for contains a class or endorsement which is different from the class
or endorsement of the LPE-learner's permit.
(2) A person holding a school permit may operate a motor vehicle, moped,
or motorcycle or an autocycle:
(a) To and from where he or she attends school, or property used by the
school he or she attends for purposes of school events or functions, over the
most direct and accessible route by the nearest highway from his or her place
of residence to transport such person or any family member who resides with
such person to attend duly scheduled courses of instruction and extracurricular
or school-related activities at the school he or she attends or on property
used by the school he or she attends; or
(b) Under the personal supervision of a licensed operator. Such licensed
operator shall be at least twenty-one years of age and licensed by this state
or another state and shall (i) for all motor vehicles other than autocycles,
motorcycles, or mopeds, actually occupy the seat beside the permitholder, (ii)
in the case of an autocycle, actually occupy the seat beside or behind the
permitholder, or (iii) in the case of a motorcycle, other than an autocycle, or
a moped, if the permitholder is within visual contact of and under the
supervision of, in the case of a motorcycle, a licensed motorcycle operator or,
in the case of a moped, a licensed motor vehicle operator.
(3) The holder of a school permit shall not use any type of interactive
wireless communication device while operating a motor vehicle on the highways
of this state. Enforcement of this subsection shall be accomplished only as a
secondary action when the holder of the school permit has been cited or charged
with a violation of some other law.
(4) A person who is younger than sixteen years of age but is over fourteen
years of age may be issued an LPE-learner's permit, which permit shall be valid
for a period of six months. An LPE-learner's permit shall not be issued until
such person successfully completes a written examination prescribed by the
department and demonstrates that he or she has sufficient powers of eyesight to
safely operate a motor vehicle, moped, or motorcycle or an autocycle.
(5)(a) While holding the LPE-learner's permit, the person may operate a
motor vehicle on the highways of this state if (i) for all motor vehicles other
than autocycles, motorcycles, or mopeds, he or she has seated next to him or
her a person who is a licensed operator, (ii) in the case of an autocycle, he
or she has seated next to or behind him or her a person who is a licensed
operator, or (iii) in the case of a motorcycle, other than an autocycle, or a
moped, he or she is within visual contact of and is under the supervision of a
person who, in the case of a motorcycle, is a licensed motorcycle operator or,
in the case of a moped, is a licensed motor vehicle operator. Such licensed
motor vehicle or motorcycle operator shall be at least twenty-one years of age
and licensed by this state or another state.
(b) The holder of an LPE-learner's permit shall not use any type of
interactive wireless communication device while operating a motor vehicle on
the highways of this state. Enforcement of this subdivision shall be
accomplished only as a secondary action when the holder of the LPE-learner's
permit has been cited or charged with a violation of some other law.
(6) Department personnel or the county treasurer shall collect the fees
fee and surcharge prescribed in section 60-4,115 from each successful applicant
for a school or LPE-learner's permit. All school permits shall be subject to
impoundment or revocation under the terms of section 60-496. Any person who
violates the terms of a school permit shall be guilty of an infraction and
shall not be eligible for another school, farm, LPD-learner's, or LPE-learner's
permit until he or she has attained the age of sixteen years.
(7) Any person who holds a permit issued under this section and has
violated subdivision (3)(b) or (c) of section 28-306, subdivision (3)(b) or (c)
of section 28-394, or section 28-1254, 60-6,196, 60-6,197, 60-6,197.06, or
60-6,198 shall not be eligible for an ignition interlock permit.
Sec. 32. Section 60-4,126, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-4,126 (1) Any person who is younger than sixteen years of age but is
over thirteen years of age and resides upon a farm in this state or is fourteen
years of age or older and is employed for compensation upon a farm in this
state may obtain a farm permit authorizing the operation of farm tractors,
minitrucks, and other motorized implements of farm husbandry upon the highways
of this state if the applicant for such farm permit furnishes satisfactory
proof of age and satisfactorily demonstrates that he or she has knowledge of
the operation of such equipment and of the rules of the road and laws
respecting the operation of motor vehicles upon the highways of this state. The
fee for an original, renewal, or replacement farm permit shall be the fees fee
and surcharge prescribed in section 60-4,115. All farm permits shall be subject
-16-

LB97 LB97
2025 2025
to revocation under the terms of section 60-496. Any person who violates the
terms of a farm permit shall be guilty of an infraction and shall not be
eligible for another school, farm, LPD-learner's, or LPE-learner's permit until
he or she has attained the age of sixteen years.
(2) Any person who holds a permit issued under this section and has
violated subdivision (3)(b) or (c) of section 28-306, subdivision (3)(b) or (c)
of section 28-394, or section 28-1254, 60-6,196, 60-6,197, 60-6,197.06, or
60-6,198 shall not be eligible for an ignition interlock permit.
Sec. 33. Section 60-4,127, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-4,127 (1) No person shall operate a motorcycle on the alleys or
highways of the State of Nebraska until such person has obtained a Class M
license. No such license shall be issued until the applicant has (a) met the
vision and physical requirements established under section 60-4,118 for
operation of a motor vehicle and (b) successfully completed an examination,
including the actual operation of a motorcycle, prescribed by the director,
except that the required examination may be waived, including the actual
operation of a motorcycle, if the applicant presents proof of successful
completion of a motorcycle safety course under the Motorcycle Safety Education
Act within the immediately preceding twenty-four months.
(2) Department personnel shall conduct the examination of the applicants
and deliver to each successful applicant an issuance certificate or a receipt.
If department personnel issue a receipt, department personnel shall collect the
fees fee and surcharge as provided in section 60-4,115 and issue a receipt with
driving privileges which is valid for up to thirty days. In counties where the
county treasurer collects fees and issues receipts, the certificate may be
presented to the county treasurer within ninety days after issuance. Upon
presentation of an issuance certificate, the county treasurer shall collect the
fees fee and surcharge for a Class M license as prescribed by section 60-4,115
and issue a receipt with driving privileges which is valid for up to thirty
days. If department personnel refuse to issue an issuance certificate or
receipt, the department personnel shall state such cause in writing and deliver
such written cause to the applicant. The license shall be delivered as provided
in section 60-4,113. If the applicant is the holder of an operator's license,
the county treasurer or department personnel shall have endorsed on the license
the authorization to operate a motorcycle. Fees for Class M licenses shall be
as provided by section 60-4,115.
(3) For purposes of this section, motorcycle does not include an
autocycle.
Sec. 34. Section 60-4,148, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
60-4,148 (1) All commercial drivers' licenses shall be issued by the
department as provided in sections 60-4,148.01 and 60-4,149. Successful
applicants shall pay the fees fee and surcharge prescribed in section 60-4,115.
(2) Any person making application to add or remove a class of commercial
motor vehicle, any endorsement, or any restriction to or from a previously
issued and outstanding commercial driver's license shall pay the fees fee and
surcharge prescribed in section 60-4,115.
Sec. 35. Section 60-4,148.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-4,148.01 (1) The department may develop and offer methods for
successful applicants to obtain, renew, and replace commercial drivers'
licenses electronically and for the electronic replacement of CLP-commercial
learners' permits.
(2)(a) An applicant who has successfully passed the knowledge and skills
tests for a commercial driver's license pursuant to section 60-4,149 and who
has a digital image and digital signature preserved in the digital system that
is not more than ten years old may obtain a commercial driver's license using
the preserved digital image and digital signature by electronic means in a
manner prescribed by the department pursuant to this subsection.
(b) To be eligible to obtain a license pursuant to this subsection:
(i) There shall have been no changes to the applicant's name since his or
her most recent application for a CLP-commercial learner's permit;
(ii) The new license shall not contain a hazardous materials endorsement;
(iii) The applicant shall meet the requirements of section 60-4,144 and
submit the information and documentation and make the certifications required
under section 60-4,144; and
(iv) The applicant shall satisfy any other eligibility criteria that the
department may prescribe pursuant to subsection (6) of this section.
(c) The successful applicant shall pay the fees fee and surcharge
prescribed in section 60-4,115. Upon receipt of such fees fee and surcharge and
an application it deems satisfactory, the department shall deliver the license
by mail.
(3)(a) An applicant whose commercial driver's license expires prior to his
or her seventy-second birthday and who has a digital image and digital
signature preserved in the digital system may, once every ten years, renew such
license using the preserved digital image and digital signature by electronic
means in a manner prescribed by the department pursuant to this subsection.
(b) To be eligible for renewal under this subsection:
(i) The renewal shall be prior to or within one year after expiration of
such license;
(ii) The driving record abstract maintained in the department's
computerized records shall show that such license is not suspended, revoked,
-17-

LB97 LB97
2025 2025
canceled, or disqualified;
(iii) There shall be no changes to the applicant's name or to the class,
endorsements, or restrictions on such license;
(iv) The applicant shall not hold a hazardous materials endorsement or
shall relinquish such endorsement;
(v) The applicant shall meet the requirements of section 60-4,144 and
submit the information and documentation and make the certifications required
under section 60-4,144; and
(vi) The applicant shall satisfy any other eligibility criteria that the
department may prescribe pursuant to subsection (6) of this section.
(c) Every applicant seeking renewal of his or her commercial driver's
license shall apply for renewal in person at least once every ten years and
have a new digital image and digital signature captured.
(d) An applicant seeking renewal under this subsection (3) shall pay the
fees fee and surcharge prescribed in section 60-4,115. Upon receipt of such
fees fee and surcharge and an application it deems satisfactory, the department
shall deliver the renewal license or permit by mail.
(4)(a) Any person holding a commercial driver's license or CLP-commercial
learner's permit who has a digital image and digital signature not more than
ten years old preserved in the digital system and who loses his or her license
or permit, who requires issuance of a replacement license or permit because of
a change of address, or whose license or permit is mutilated or unreadable may
obtain a replacement commercial driver's license or CLP-commercial learner's
permit using the preserved digital image and digital signature by electronic
means in a manner prescribed by the department pursuant to this subsection.
(b) To be eligible to obtain a replacement license or permit pursuant to
this subsection:
(i) There shall be no changes to the applicant's name and no changes to
the class, endorsements, or restrictions on such license or permit;
(ii) The applicant shall meet the requirements of section 60-4,144 and
submit the information and documentation and make the certifications required
under section 60-4,144; and
(iii) The applicant shall satisfy any other eligibility criteria that the
department may prescribe pursuant to subsection (6) of this section.
(c) An application for a replacement license or permit because of a change
of address shall be made within sixty days after the change of address.
(d) An applicant seeking replacement under this subsection (4) of this
section shall pay the fees fee and surcharge prescribed in section 60-4,115.
Upon receipt of such fees fee and surcharge and an application it deems
satisfactory, the department shall deliver the replacement license or permit by
mail. The replacement license or permit shall be subject to the provisions of
subsection (4) of section 60-4,150.
(5) An application to obtain, renew, or replace a commercial driver's
license or to replace a CLP-commercial learner's permit because of a change of
name may not be made electronically pursuant to this section and shall be made
in person at a licensing station within sixty days after the change of name.
(6) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
governing eligibility for the use of electronic methods for successful
applicants to obtain, renew, or replace commercial drivers' licenses and for
the replacement of CLP-commercial learners' permits, taking into consideration
medical and vision requirements, safety concerns, and any other factors
consistent with the purposes of the Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act that
the director deems relevant.
Sec. 36. Section 60-4,149, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
60-4,149 (1) The director shall appoint as his or her agents one or more
department personnel who shall examine all applicants for a commercial driver's
license or a CLP-commercial learner's permit as provided in section 60-4,144.
The same department personnel may be assigned to one or more counties by the
director. In counties in which the county treasurer collects the fees and
issues receipts, the county shall furnish office space for the administration
of the license or permit examination. Department personnel shall conduct the
examination of applicants and deliver to each successful applicant an issuance
certificate or receipt. The certificate may be presented to the county
treasurer within ninety days after issuance, and the county treasurer shall
collect the fees fee and surcharge as provided in section 60-4,115 and issue a
receipt which is valid for up to thirty days. If a commercial driver's license
or CLP-commercial CLP-commerical learner's permit is being issued, the receipt
shall also authorize driving privileges for such thirty-day period. If
department personnel refuse to issue an issuance certificate or receipt, the
department personnel shall state such cause in writing and deliver such written
cause to the applicant.
(2)(a) The segments of the driving skills examination shall be
administered and successfully completed in the following order: Pre-trip
inspection, basic vehicle control skills, and on-road skills. If an applicant
fails one segment of the driving skills examination, the applicant cannot
continue to the next segment of the examination.
(b) Passing scores for the knowledge and skills tests shall meet the
standards contained in 49 C.F.R. 383.135.
(3) Except as provided for in sections 60-4,157 and 60-4,158, all
commercial driver's license examinations shall be conducted by department
personnel designated by the director. Each successful applicant shall be issued
a certificate or receipt entitling the applicant to secure a commercial
-18-

LB97 LB97
2025 2025
driver's license. If department personnel refuse to issue such certificate or
receipt, he or she shall state such cause in writing and deliver the same to
the applicant. Department personnel shall not be required to hold a commercial
driver's license to administer a driving skills examination and occupy the seat
beside an applicant for a commercial driver's license.
(4) The successful applicant shall, within ten days after renewal or
within twenty-four hours after initial issuance, pay the fees fee and surcharge
as provided in section 60-4,115. A receipt with driving privileges which is
valid for up to thirty days shall be issued. The commercial driver's license
shall be delivered to the applicant as provided in section 60-4,113.
(5) In lieu of proceeding under subsection (4) of this section, the
successful applicant may pay the fees fee and surcharge as provided in section
60-4,115 and electronically submit an application prescribed by the department
in a manner prescribed by the department pursuant to section 60-4,148.01.
Sec. 37. Section 60-4,150, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
60-4,150 (1) Any person holding a commercial driver's license or CLP-
commercial learner's permit who loses his or her license or permit, who
requires issuance of a replacement license or permit because of a change of
name or address, or whose license or permit is mutilated or unreadable may
obtain a replacement commercial driver's license or CLP-commercial learner's
permit by filing an application pursuant to this section and by furnishing
proof of identification in accordance with section 60-4,144. Any person seeking
a replacement license or permit for such reasons, except because of a change of
name, may also obtain a replacement license or permit by submitting an
electronic application pursuant to section 60-4,148.01.
(2) An application for a replacement license or permit because of a change
of name or address shall be made within sixty days after the change of name or
address.
(3) A replacement commercial driver's license or CLP-commercial learner's
permit issued pursuant to this section shall be delivered to the applicant as
provided in section 60-4,113 after department personnel or the county treasurer
collects the fees fee and surcharge prescribed in section 60-4,115 and issues
the applicant a receipt with driving privileges which is valid for up to thirty
days. Replacement commercial drivers' licenses or CLP-commercial learners'
permits issued pursuant to this section shall be issued in the manner provided
for the issuance of original and renewal commercial drivers' licenses or the
issuance of permits as provided for by section 60-4,149.
(4) Upon issuance of any replacement commercial driver's license or
permit, the commercial driver's license or CLP-commercial learner's permit for
which the replacement license or permit is issued shall be void. Each
replacement commercial driver's license or CLP-commercial learner's permit
shall be issued with the same expiration date as the license or permit for
which the replacement is issued. The replacement license or permit shall also
state the new issuance date.
Sec. 38. Section 60-4,181, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
60-4,181 (1) Each applicant for a state identification card shall provide
the information and documentation required by sections 60-484, 60-484.04, and
60-484.07. The form of the state identification card shall comply with section
60-4,117. The applicant shall present an issuance certificate to the county
treasurer for a state identification card. Department personnel or the county
treasurer shall collect the fees fee and surcharge as prescribed in section
60-4,115 and issue a receipt to the applicant which is valid up to thirty days.
The state identification card shall be delivered to the applicant as provided
in section 60-4,113.
(2) The director may summarily cancel any state identification card, and
any judge or magistrate may order a state identification card canceled in a
judgment of conviction, if the application or information presented by the
applicant contains any false or fraudulent statements which were deliberately
and knowingly made as to any matter material to the issuance of the card or if
the application or information presented by the applicant does not contain
required or correct information. Any state identification card so obtained
shall be void from the date of issuance. Any judgment of conviction ordering
cancellation of a state identification card shall be transmitted to the
director who shall cancel the card.
(3) No person shall be a holder of a state identification card and an
operator's license at the same time.
Sec. 39. Section 60-636, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
60-636 (1) Minibike shall mean a two-wheel motor vehicle that:
(a) Has which has a total wheel and tire diameter of less than fourteen
inches;
(b) Has or an engine-rated capacity of less than forty-five cubic
centimeters displacement;
(c) Has an engine power output of less than three horsepower;
(d) Has an engine-rated capacity of less than two thousand two hundred
thirty-eight watts; or
(e) Was or any other two-wheel motor vehicle primarily designed by the
manufacturer for off-road use only.
(2) Minibike shall not include an electric personal assistive mobility
device.
Sec. 40. Section 60-6,211.05, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-19-

LB97 LB97
2025 2025
amended to read:
60-6,211.05 (1) If an order is granted under section 60-6,196 or 60-6,197
and sections 60-6,197.02 and 60-6,197.03, the court may order that the
defendant install an ignition interlock device of a type approved by the
Director of Motor Vehicles on each motor vehicle operated by the defendant
during the period of revocation. Upon sufficient evidence of installation, the
defendant may apply to the director for an ignition interlock permit pursuant
to section 60-4,118.06. The device shall, without tampering or the intervention
of another person, prevent the defendant from operating the motor vehicle when
the defendant has an alcohol concentration greater than three-hundredths of one
gram or more by weight of alcohol per one hundred milliliters of his or her
blood or three-hundredths of one gram or more by weight of alcohol per two
hundred ten liters of his or her breath. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall
issue an ignition interlock permit to the defendant under section 60-4,118.06
only upon sufficient proof that a defendant has installed an ignition interlock
device on any motor vehicle that the defendant will operate during his or her
release.
(2) If the court orders installation of an ignition interlock device and
issuance of an ignition interlock permit pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section, the court may also order the use of a continuous alcohol monitoring
device and abstention from alcohol use at all times. The device shall, without
tampering or the intervention of another person, test and record the alcohol
consumption level of the defendant on a periodic basis and transmit such
information to probation authorities.
(3)(a) Prior to January 1, 2026, any (3) Any order issued by the court
pursuant to this section shall not take effect until the defendant is eligible
to operate a motor vehicle pursuant to subsection (8) of section 60-498.01. A
person shall be eligible to be issued an ignition interlock permit allowing
operation of a motor vehicle equipped with an ignition interlock device if he
or she is not subject to any other suspension, cancellation, required no-
driving period, or period of revocation and has successfully completed the
ignition interlock permit application process. The Department of Motor Vehicles
shall review its records and the driving record abstract of any person who
applies for an ignition interlock permit allowing operation of a motor vehicle
equipped with an ignition interlock device to determine (i) (a) the applicant's
eligibility for an ignition interlock permit, (ii) (b) the applicant's previous
convictions under section 60-6,196, 60-6,197, or 60-6,197.06 or any previous
administrative license revocation, if any, and (iii) (c) if the applicant is
subject to any required no-drive periods before the ignition interlock permit
may be issued.
(b) Beginning January 1, 2026, any order issued by the court, or issued
pursuant to a court order or administrative license revocation order from
another jurisdiction that substantially complies with this section and section
60-6,197.03, shall not take effect until the defendant is eligible to operate a
motor vehicle pursuant to subsection (8) of section 60-498.01. A person shall
be eligible to be issued an ignition interlock permit allowing operation of a
motor vehicle equipped with an ignition interlock device if he or she is not
subject to any other suspension, cancellation, required no-driving period, or
period of revocation and has successfully completed the ignition interlock
permit application process. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall, before the
ignition interlock permit may be issued, review its records and the driving
record abstract of any person who applies for an ignition interlock permit
allowing operation of a motor vehicle equipped with an ignition interlock
device to determine (i) the applicant's eligibility for an ignition interlock
permit, (ii) the applicant's previous convictions under section 60-6,196,
60-6,197, or 60-6,197.06 or any previous administrative license revocation, if
any, and (iii) if the applicant is subject to any required no-drive periods.
(4)(a) If the court orders an ignition interlock device or the Board of
Pardons orders an ignition interlock device under section 83-1,127.02, the
court or the Board of Pardons shall order the defendant to apply for an
ignition interlock permit as provided in section 60-4,118.06 which indicates
that the defendant is only allowed to operate a motor vehicle equipped with an
ignition interlock device.
(b) Such court order shall remain in effect for a period of time as
determined by the court not to exceed the maximum term of revocation which the
court could have imposed according to the nature of the violation and shall
allow operation by the defendant of only an ignition-interlock-equipped motor
vehicle.
(c) Such Board of Pardons order shall remain in effect for a period of
time not to exceed any period of revocation the applicant is subject to at the
time the application for a reprieve is made.
(5) Any person restricted to operating a motor vehicle equipped with an
ignition interlock device, pursuant to a Board of Pardons order, who operates
upon the highways of this state a motor vehicle without such device or if the
device has been disabled, bypassed, or altered in any way, shall be punished as
provided in subsection (3) of section 83-1,127.02.
(6) If a person ordered to use a continuous alcohol monitoring device and
abstain from alcohol use pursuant to a court order as provided in subsection
(2) of this section violates the provisions of such court order by removing,
tampering with, or otherwise bypassing the continuous alcohol monitoring device
or by consuming alcohol while required to use such device, he or she shall have
his or her ignition interlock permit revoked and be unable to apply for
reinstatement for the duration of the revocation period imposed by the court.
-20-

LB97 LB97
2025 2025
(7) The director shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
regarding the approval of ignition interlock devices, the means of installing
ignition interlock devices, and the means of administering the ignition
interlock permit program.
(8)(a) The costs incurred in order to comply with the ignition interlock
requirements of this section shall be paid directly to the ignition interlock
provider by the person complying with an order for an ignition interlock permit
and installation of an ignition interlock device.
(b) If the Department of Motor Vehicles has determined the person to be
indigent and incapable of paying for the cost of installation, removal, or
maintenance of the ignition interlock device in accordance with this section,
such costs shall be paid out of the Department of Motor Vehicles Ignition
Interlock Fund if such funds are available, according to rules and regulations
adopted and promulgated by the department. Such costs shall also be paid out of
the Department of Motor Vehicles Ignition Interlock Fund if such funds are
available and if the court or the Board of Pardons, whichever is applicable,
has determined the person to be indigent and incapable of paying for the cost
of installation, removal, or maintenance of the ignition interlock device in
accordance with this section. The Department of Motor Vehicles Ignition
Interlock Fund is created. Money in the Department of Motor Vehicles Ignition
Interlock Fund may be used for transfers to the General Fund at the direction
of the Legislature. On October 1, 2017, or as soon thereafter as
administratively possible, the State Treasurer shall transfer twenty-five
thousand dollars from the Department of Motor Vehicles Ignition Interlock Fund
to the Violence Prevention Cash Fund. On October 1, 2018, or as soon thereafter
as administratively possible, the State Treasurer shall transfer twenty-five
thousand dollars from the Department of Motor Vehicles Ignition Interlock Fund
to the Violence Prevention Cash Fund. Any money in the Department of Motor
Vehicles Ignition Interlock Fund available for investment shall be invested by
the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and
the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(9)(a)(i) An ignition interlock service facility shall notify the
appropriate district probation office or the appropriate court, as applicable,
of any evidence of tampering with or circumvention of an ignition interlock
device, or any attempts to do so, when the facility becomes aware of such
evidence. Failure of the facility to provide notification as provided in this
subdivision is a Class V misdemeanor.
(ii) An ignition interlock service facility shall notify the Department of
Motor Vehicles, if the ignition interlock permit is issued pursuant to sections
60-498.01 to 60-498.04, of any evidence of tampering with or circumvention of
an ignition interlock device, or any attempts to do so, when the facility
becomes aware of such evidence. Failure of the facility to provide notification
as provided in this subdivision is a Class V misdemeanor.
(b) If a district probation office receives evidence of tampering with or
circumvention of an ignition interlock device, or any attempts to do so, from
an ignition interlock service facility, the district probation office shall
notify the appropriate court of such violation. The court shall immediately
schedule an evidentiary hearing to be held within fourteen days after receiving
such evidence, either from the district probation office or an ignition
interlock service facility, and the court shall cause notice of the hearing to
be given to the person operating a motor vehicle pursuant to an order under
subsection (1) of this section. If the person who is the subject of such
evidence does not appear at the hearing and show cause why the order made
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section should remain in effect, the court
shall rescind the original order. Nothing in this subsection shall apply to an
order made by the Board of Pardons pursuant to section 83-1,127.02.
(10) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the issuance of an
ignition interlock permit by the Department of Motor Vehicles under section
60-498.01 or an order for the installation of an ignition interlock device and
ignition interlock permit made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section as
part of a conviction, as well as the administration of such court order by the
Office of Probation Administration for the installation, maintenance, and
removal of such device, as applicable, shall not be construed to create an
order of probation when an order of probation has not been issued.
Sec. 41. Section 60-1513, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
60-1513 The Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund is hereby created. The
fund shall be administered by the Director of Motor Vehicles. In addition to
money paid to the department or credited or remitted to the fund, the fund may
also receive reimbursement from counties. The fund shall be used by the
Department of Motor Vehicles to carry out its duties as deemed necessary by the
Director of Motor Vehicles, except that transfers from the fund to the General
Fund or the Vehicle Title and Registration System Replacement and Maintenance
Cash Fund may be made at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the
Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Beginning October 1,
2024, any investment earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be
credited to the General Fund.
The State Treasurer shall transfer five million three hundred twenty-five
thousand dollars from the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund to the Vehicle
Title and Registration System Replacement and Maintenance Cash Fund on or
before June 30, 2017, as directed by the budget administrator of the budget
-21-

LB97 LB97
2025 2025
division of the Department of Administrative Services.
Sec. 42. Section 60-2904, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
60-2904 For purposes of the Uniform Motor Vehicle Records Disclosure Act:
(1) Department means the Department of Motor Vehicles or the duly
authorized agents or contractors of the department responsible to compile and
maintain motor vehicle records;
(2) Disclose means to engage in any practice or conduct to make available
and make known personal information contained in a motor vehicle record about a
person to any other person, organization, or entity by any means of
communication;
(3) Individual record means a motor vehicle record containing personal
information about a designated person who is the subject of the record as
identified in a request;
(4) Motor vehicle record means any record that pertains to a motor vehicle
operator's or driver's license or permit, motor vehicle, trailer, motorboat,
all-terrain vehicle, utility-type vehicle, snowmobile, or minibike registration
or certificate of title, or state identification card issued by the department
or any other state or local agency authorized to issue any of such forms of
credentials;
(5) Person means an individual, organization, or entity;
(6) Personal information means information that identifies a person,
including an individual's driver identification number, name, and address
excluding zip code, and telephone number, but does not include information on
collisions, driving, operating, or equipment-related violations, or operator's
license or registration status; and
(7) Sensitive personal information means an individual's telephone number,
email address, operator's license digital image, social security number, and
medical or disability information.
Sec. 43. Section 66-1414, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
66-1414 (1) Any fuel tax collected pursuant to the agreement shall be
credited remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Motor Carrier
Services Division Distributive Fund to carry out the International Fuel Tax
Agreement Act.
(2) The Motor Carrier Services Division Distributive Fund is created. The
fund shall be set apart and maintained by the State Treasurer to carry out the
International Fuel Tax Agreement Act and the International Registration Plan
Act. Any money in the Motor Carrier Services Division Distributive Fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer
pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act. Any interest received on money in the Motor Carrier Services
Division Distributive Fund shall be credited to the Highway Trust Fund.
Sec. 44. Sections 6, 15, 18, 20, 21, 22, 23, and 46 of this act become
operative three calendar months after the adjournment of this legislative
session. The other sections of this act become operative on their effective
date.
Sec. 45. Original sections 37-1202, 60-101, 60-102, 60-121, 60-137,
60-158, 60-167, 60-337, 60-399, 60-4,113, 60-4,117, 60-4,118.06, 60-4,120.01,
60-4,123, 60-4,126, 60-4,127, 60-636, 60-6,211.05, 60-2904, and 66-1414,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 29-2292, 37-1201, 60-146,
60-169, 60-4,115, 60-4,120, 60-4,124, 60-4,148, 60-4,148.01, 60-4,149,
60-4,150, 60-4,181, and 60-1513, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
are repealed.
Sec. 46. Original sections 37-1284, 60-168, and 60-3,157, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 60-392, 60-3,100, 60-3,101, and 60-3,102,
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 47. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-22-